src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_äda/äb/i/ägaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = eläda:el
! V_??
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:ä V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:ä N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:ä ACT_COND_type ;
:ä ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:ä VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:ä V-ConsonantStem_d/g ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:ä INF_da ;

!! preterite stem vowel
: ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_ta/äb/i/kaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = heitta:heit, heitäb heiti
! V_AVAITA
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:ä V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:ä N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:ä ACT_COND_type ;!heitäiži
! nu
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ; !heitnu

: VNONFIN_m ;

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
 V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
: INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
: ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i


!!here today
LEXICON V_OLDA ! olda:
!! @LEXNAME@ (adding :ole to vowstem)
!:le V-VowelStem ;
!:l V-ConsonantStem ;
:ole ACT_IMPRT_SG2 ;
:ole ACT_IND_PRS_SG_CONNEG ;
:ole ACT_IND_PRT_SG_CONNEG ;!CHECKME 20241110
:ole ACT_IND_PRSSG1 ;
:ole ACT_IND_PRSSG2 ;
:ole ACT_IND_PRSPL1 ;
:ole ACT_IND_PRSPL2 ;

+Ind+Prs+Sg3:o%>m K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:o%>ma K ;
+Pot:linne ACT_IND_PRS ;

!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:oli N_TEGII ;! this might be the same as V-VowelStem-PRT with an i in next lexicon

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:ol ACT_COND_type ;
:ol ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;
:ole VNONFIN_m ;

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:ol V-ConsonantStem_d/g ;
:ol V-ConsonantStem_de/dud/das ;
:ol IMPRT_gha ;

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:ol INF_da ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:ol ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_TEHTA ! 
!! @LEXNAME@ = tehta:te (adding :ge to vowst and indprs3)
:ge V-VowelStem-PRS ;
:g V-VowelStem-PRT ;
:g V-ConsonantStem_OTHER ;
:h V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
: V-ConsonantStem_kaha/koi ;
:ge INDPRS3 ;
:h INF_ta ;
:h VNONFIN_m ;
:h ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:gi N_TEGII ;! this might be the same as V-VowelStem-PRT with an i in next lexicon

LEXICON V_SIRTA !
!! @LEXNAME@ =  sirta:sir
:da V-VowelStem-PRS ;
:d V-VowelStem-PRT ;
:d V-ConsonantStem_OTHER ;
 V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
:da INDPRS3 ;
! PRFPRC_nu ;

LEXICON V_JOKSTA ! 
!! @LEXNAME@ = joksta:joks
:e V-VowelStem-PRS ;
: V-VowelStem-PRT ;
 V-ConsonantStem ;
:e INDPRS3 ;
INF_ta ;
! PRFPRC_nu ;
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:i N_TEGII ;! this might be the same as V-VowelStem-PRT with an i in next lexicon

LEXICON V_LETA ! 
!! @LEXNAME@ = leta:le
:nda V-VowelStem-PRS ;
:nd V-VowelStem-PRT ;
:nd V-ConsonantStem_OTHER ;
 V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
:nda INDPRS3 ;
INF_ta ;
! PRFPRC_nu ;


LEXICON V_MAKSTA ! 
!! @LEXNAME@ = maksta:maks
:a V-VowelStem-PRS ;
:o V-VowelStem-PRT ;
 V-ConsonantStem ;
:a INDPRS3 ;
INF_ta ;
! PRFPRC_nu ;

LEXICON V_ASTTA ! 
!! @LEXNAME@ = astta:ast
!astub
!astui
:u V-VowelStem-PRS ;
:u V-VowelStem-PRT ;
 V-ConsonantStem ;
:u INDPRS3 ;
INF_ta ;
! PRFPRC_nu ;


LEXICON V_HUBETA ! 
!! @LEXNAME@ = hubeta:hube
:ne V-VowelStem-PRS ;
:n V-VowelStem-PRT ;
 V-ConsonantStem ;
:ne INDPRS3 ;
INF_ta ;
! PRFPRC_nu ;
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:ni N_TEGII ;! this might be the same as V-VowelStem-PRT with an i in next lexicon


LEXICON V_OTTA ! 
!! @LEXNAME@ = otta:ot
:a V-VowelStem-PRS ;
: V-VowelStem-PRT ;
 V-ConsonantStem ;
:a INDPRS3 ;
INF_ta ;
 ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

LEXICON V_ABIDOITTA ! 
!! @LEXNAME@ = abidoitta:abidoi
!čeb
!či
:če V-VowelStem-PRS ;
: V-VowelStem-PRT ;
 V-ConsonantStem ;
:čeb INDPRS3 ;
INF_tta ;
 ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;


LEXICON V_OIGETA !oigeta:oige
!! @LEXNAME@
:nda V-VowelStem-PRS ;
:nz V-VowelStem-PRT ;
 V-ConsonantStem ;
:nda INDPRS3 ;
INF_ta ;
:nda ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

LEXICON V_TUGETA
!! @LEXNAME@ = tugeta:tuge
:da V-VowelStem ;
:%^DEVOICE V-ConsonantStem ;
:nda INDPRS3 ;
INF_ta ;
! PRFPRC_nu ;

LEXICON V_HOMAITA !
!! @LEXNAME@ =  homaita:homai
:če V-VowelStem-PRS ;
:č V-VowelStem-PRT ;
 V-ConsonantStem ;
:če INDPRS3 ;
INF_ta ;
:če ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:či N_TEGII ;! this might be the same as V-VowelStem-PRT with an i in next lexicon

!
LEXICON V_VALITA
!! @LEXNAME@  =  valita:vali
:če V-VowelStem ;
:%^DEVOICE V-ConsonantStem ;
:če INDPRS3 ;
INF_ta ;
! PRFPRC_nu ;

!! ### Default lexicon

LEXICON V_
!! @LEXNAME@ default verb lexicon
 V-VowelStem ;
 V-ConsonantStem ;

!! ## The three contlex types ??2024-11-08

!! ### PNDPRS3

LEXICON INDPRS3
 ACT_IND_PRSSG3 ;
 ACT_IND_PRSPL3 ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT
:%>i ACT_IND_PRT_PERS ;
:%>i REFL_IND_PRT_PERS ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_NO_i
ACT_IND_PRT_PERS ;
REFL_IND_PRT_PERS ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_PERS
 INDPRTSG1 ;
 INDPRTSG2 ;
 INDPRTSG3 ;
 INDPRTPL1 ;
 INDPRTPL2 ;
 INDPRTPL3 ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_SG_CONNEG
+Ind+Prt+Sg+ConNeg:%>nd K ;

LEXICON INDPRTSG1
!! @LEXNAME@ for Sg1
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>n K ;

LEXICON INDPRTSG2
!! @LEXNAME@ for Sg2
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>d K ;

LEXICON INDPRTSG3
!! @LEXNAME@ for Sg3
+Ind+Prt+Sg3: K ;

LEXICON INDPRTPL1
!! @LEXNAME@ for Pl1
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>m K ;

LEXICON INDPRTPL2
!! @LEXNAME@ for Pl2
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>t K ;

LEXICON INDPRTPL3
!! @LEXNAME@ for Pl3
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>ba K ;



!! ### Vowel stems

LEXICON V-VowelStem
!! @LEXNAME@
V-VowelStem-PRS ;
V-VowelStem-PRT ;



LEXICON V-VowelStem-PRS
!! @LEXNAME@ This lexicon gives all forms for formatives with obligatory onset vowel
 REFL_IND_PRS ;
 ACT_IMPRT_SG2 ;
 ACT_IND_PRS ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_SG_CONNEG ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_SG_CONNEG ;

+Der+Der/V:%>škande ACT_IND_PRS ;!inchoative?
+Der+Der/V:%>škande REFL_IND_PRS ;!inchoative?
+Der+Der/V:%>škanz ACT_IND_PRT ;!inchoative?
+Der+Der/V:%>ška V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;!inchoative? CHECKME 20241110

!!!!!!!!!!!
!! #### Present Morphology
!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS
 ACT_IND_PRSSG1 ;
 ACT_IND_PRSSG2 ;
 ACT_IND_PRSSG3 ;
 ACT_IND_PRSPL1 ;
 ACT_IND_PRSPL2 ;
 ACT_IND_PRSPL3 ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_SG_CONNEG ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_SG_CONNEG
+Ind+Prs+Sg+ConNeg: K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRSSG1
!! @LEXNAME@ for Sg1
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>n K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRSSG2
!! @LEXNAME@ for Sg2
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>d K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRSSG3
!! @LEXNAME@ for Sg3
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>b K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRSPL1
!! @LEXNAME@ for Pl1
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>m K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRSPL2
!! @LEXNAME@ for Pl2
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>t K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRSPL3
!! @LEXNAME@ for Pl3
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>ba K ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! #### IMPERATIVE 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON ACT_IMPRT_SG2
+Imprt+Sg2: K ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! #### present reflexive
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON REFL_IND_PRS
 REFL_IND_PRS_SG1 ;
 REFL_IND_PRS_SG2 ;
 REFL_IND_PRS_SG3 ;
 REFL_IND_PRS_PL1 ;
 REFL_IND_PRS_PL2 ;
 REFL_IND_PRS_PL3 ;
LEXICON REFL_IND_PRS_SG1
+Refl+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>moi K ;
LEXICON REFL_IND_PRS_SG2
+Refl+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>toi K ;
LEXICON REFL_IND_PRS_SG3
+Refl+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>se K ;
LEXICON REFL_IND_PRS_PL1
+Refl+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>moiš K ;
LEXICON REFL_IND_PRS_PL2
+Refl+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>toiš K ;
LEXICON REFL_IND_PRS_PL3
+Refl+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>se K ;
+Refl+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>soiš K ;!heitäsoiš 1TI.4.2
