src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
ahavoita+V:ahavoi V_HOMAITA ;
anikoita+V:anikoi V_HOMAITA ;
ažlakoita+V:ažlakoi V_HOMAITA ;
beregoitta+V:beregoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
burlakoita+V:burlakoi V_HOMAITA ;
dölta+v2+V:dʼol V_JOKSTA ;
erigoitta+V:erigoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
furskta+V:fursk V_ASTTA ;
harjeta+V:harje V_HUBETA ;
harveta+V:harve V_OIGETA ;
hatroita+V:hatroi V_HOMAITA ;
haškta+v1+V:hašk V_OTTA ;
heikta+v1+V:heik V_OTTA ;
heikta+v1+V:heik V_ASTTA ;
heitta+V:hei V_ABIDOITTA ;
hihtta+V:hiht V_OTTA ;
hilleta+V:hille V_OIGETA ;
hirnoita+V:hirnoi V_HOMAITA ;
hirskta+V:hirsk V_ASTTA ;
holestoitta+V:holestoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
hoštta+V:hošt V_OTTA ;
hubeta+V:hube V_HUBETA ;
hämeta+V:häme V_OIGETA ;
hämäroita+V:hämäroi V_HOMAITA ;
häta+V:hä V_SIRTA ;
höukta+V:höuk V_ASTTA ;
ihastoitta+V:ihastoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
itkta+V:itk V_JOKSTA ;
iškta+V:išk V_JOKSTA ;
joksta+V:joks V_JOKSTA ;
jotta+V:jot V_OTTA ;
jätta+V:jät V_OTTA ;
jügeta+V:jüge V_OIGETA ;
kaideta+V:kaide V_OIGETA ;
kaikta+V:kaik V_ASTTA ;
kaita+V:kai V_HOMAITA ;
kajahtoitta+V:kajahtoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
kastta+V:kast V_MAKSTA ;
katta+V:kat V_MAKSTA ;
kebneta+V:kebne V_OIGETA ;
kelikoita+V:kelikoi V_HOMAITA ;
kibenzoitta+V:kibenzoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
kidžeroita+V:kidžeroi V_HOMAITA ;
kitta+V:kit V_ta/äb/i/kaha ;
kištta+V:kišt V_OTTA ;
kohteta+V:kohte V_OIGETA ;
kokta+V:kok V_ASTTA ;
korhakoita+V:korhakoi V_HOMAITA ;
koskta+V:kosk V_JOKSTA ;
koverzoitta+V:koverzoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
koveta+V:kove V_OIGETA ;
kuldoita+V:kuldoi V_HOMAITA ;
kuštta+V:kušt V_MAKSTA ;
käskta+V:käsk V_JOKSTA ;
käta+v1+V:kä V_LETA ;
kükseta+V:kükse V_OIGETA ;
küksta+V:küks V_JOKSTA ;
külläštoitta+V:külläštoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
kütʼkta+V:kütʼk V_ASTTA ;
laskta+V:lask V_JOKSTA ;
leta+v1+V:le V_LETA ;
leta+v1+V:le V_OIGETA ;
levenzoitta+V:levenzoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
ličta+V:lič V_JOKSTA ;
lohketa+V:lohke V_OIGETA ;
loita+V:loi V_HOMAITA ;
loštta+V:lošt V_OTTA ;
lähenzoitta+V:lähenzoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
läheta+V:lähe V_HUBETA ;
lüheta+V:lühe V_OIGETA ;
lüpsta+V:lüps V_OTTA ;
magutoitta+V:magutoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
mahtta+V:maht V_MAKSTA ;
maksta+V:maks V_MAKSTA ;
mugoita+V:mugoi V_HOMAITA ;
muigeta+V:muige V_OIGETA ;
munkta+V:munk V_ASTTA ;
mureta+v1+V:mure V_HUBETA ;
musteta+V:muste V_OIGETA ;
muštta+V:mušt V_OTTA ;
möhästoitta+V:möhästoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
mürketa+V:mürke V_OIGETA ;
nagloita+V:nagloi V_HOMAITA ;
noikta+V:noik V_ASTTA ;
nomeroita+V:nomeroi V_HOMAITA ;
nozolzoitta+V:nozolzoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
nutta+V:nut V_OTTA ;
nähta+V:nä V_TEHTA ;
nääkta+V:nääk V_ASTTA ;
nühtta+V:nüht V_OTTA ;
nülʼkta+V:nülʼk V_ASTTA ;
nʼaukta+V:nʼauk V_ASTTA ;
oigeta+V:oige V_OIGETA ;
olda+V: V_OLDA ;
ombelzoitta+V:ombelzoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
opeta+V:ope V_OIGETA ;
ostta+V:ost V_OTTA ;
otta+V:ot V_OTTA ;
pageta+V:page V_HUBETA ;
paimeta+V:paime V_OIGETA ;
pakuštoitta+V:pakuštoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
palikoita+V:palikoi V_HOMAITA ;
paukta+v1+V:pauk V_MAKSTA ;
pazmoita+V:pazmoi V_HOMAITA ;
pačkta+v1+V:pačk V_MAKSTA ;
pačkta+v1+V:pačk V_ASTTA ;
paštta+V:pašt V_MAKSTA ;
pehmeta+V:pehme V_OIGETA ;
peksta+V:peks V_OTTA ;
penenzoitta+V:penenzoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
peneta+v1+V:pene V_HUBETA ;
pideta+v1+V:pide V_HUBETA ;
pideta+v1+V:pide V_OIGETA ;
pirta+V:pir V_SIRTA ;
pistta+V:pist V_OTTA ;
plokta+V:plok V_ASTTA ;
poltta+V:polt V_OTTA ;
poukahtoitta+V:poukahtoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
poukta+V:pouk V_ASTTA ;
puhlota+V:puhlo V_HUBETA ;
puukta+V:puuk V_ASTTA ;
pästta+V:päst V_OTTA ;
pöugastitta+V:pöugasti V_ABIDOITTA ;
püta+V:pü V_SIRTA ;
ratketa+V:ratke V_OIGETA ;
rebita+V:rebi V_HUBETA ;
rehkta+V:rehk V_ASTTA ;
ristikoita+V:ristikoi V_HOMAITA ;
ročkuta+V:ročku V_OTTA ;
rusketa+V:ruske V_OIGETA ;
rästta+V:räst V_OTTA ;
röhkta+V:röhk V_ASTTA ;
satta+V:sat V_MAKSTA ;
segloita+V:segloi V_HOMAITA ;
siledoitta+V:siledoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
sogeta+V:soge V_OIGETA ;
sorta+V:sor V_SIRTA ;
spasiboita+V:spasiboi V_HOMAITA ;
sureta+V:sure V_HUBETA ;
särkta+V:särk V_ASTTA ;
säta+V:sä V_SIRTA ;
sötta+V:söt V_OTTA ;
tartta+V:tart V_ASTTA ;
tartutoitta+V:tartutoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
tehta+V:te V_TEHTA ;
tirpta+V:tirp V_OTTA ;
tobneta+V:tobne V_HUBETA ;
touteta+V:toute V_OIGETA ;
toštta+V:tošt V_OTTA ;
tugeta+V:tuge V_TUGETA ;
tundištoitta+V:tundištoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
tuukta+V:tuuk V_ASTTA ;
täutta+V:täut V_OTTA ;
uhoita+V:uhoi V_HOMAITA ;
ustavzoitta+V:ustavzoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
valita+V:vali V_VALITA ;
vanhemboita+V:vanhemboi V_HOMAITA ;
vihtʼakoita+V:vihtʼakoi V_HOMAITA ;
vilʼskta+V:vilʼsk V_ASTTA ;
voita+V:voi V_SIRTA ;
voukta+V:vouk V_ASTTA ;
vähenzoitta+V:vähenzoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
väheta+v1+V:vähe V_HUBETA ;
välleta+V:välle V_OIGETA ;
väta+V:vä V_LETA ;
znamoita+V:znamoi V_HOMAITA ;
čapta+V:čap V_MAKSTA ;
činkta+V:čink V_ASTTA ;
čorskta+v1+V:čorsk V_OTTA ;
čuta+V:ču V_SIRTA ;
šlibahtoitta+V:šlibahtoi V_ABIDOITTA ;
šlukta+V:šluk V_ASTTA ;
